North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-08 County Agent [Repealed]

4-08-01.
Extension work — Petition — Submitting to vote. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0801; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 5; 1997, ch. 58, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-02.
Form of petition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0802; S.L. 1949, ch. 96, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-0802; S.L. 1983, ch. 89, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 6; 1997, ch. 58, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-03.
Form of ballot. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0803; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-04.
Election held — Candidates presented to county commissioners — Funds available for extension work. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0804; S.L. 1949, ch. 96, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 4-0804; S.L. 1983, ch. 89, § 2; 1997, ch. 58, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-05.
Petition for discontinuance of extension work — Form of petition — Election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0805; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 7; 1997, ch. 58, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-06.
Filing date of petitions for election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0806; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 6; 2007, ch. 56, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-07.
Discontinuance of extension agent — Distribution of funds accumulated. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2263; S.L. 1917, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 191, § 1; 1925, ch. 115, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2263; R.C. 1943, § 4-0807; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-08.
Expending funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2265; R.C. 1943, § 4-0808; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-09.
Budgeting for extension agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0809; S.L. 1965, ch. 74, § 1; 1997, ch. 58, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-10.
Extension agent to submit monthly account of expenditures — Position adjustments — Budget section report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0810; S.L. 1947, ch. 3, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-0810; S.L. 1961, ch. 100, § 1; 1995, ch. 62, § 2; 1997, ch. 58, § 9; 1999, ch. 21, § 21; 2015, ch. 20, § 8, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-10.1.
Achievement days — Premiums — Report of extension agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 51, § 1; 1983, ch. 90, § 1; 1989, ch. 74, § 1; 1999, ch. 54, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-11.
Report to county auditor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0811; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-12.
Direction and supervision of extension agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0812; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-13.
Vacancies — How to be filled. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0813; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-14.
Dissatisfaction with extension agent — Meeting to be arranged. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 114, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3259a; R.C. 1943, § 4-0814; S.L. 1997, ch. 58, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-15.
Extension work levy and funding — Additional levy with voter approval. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 96, § 3; 1951, ch. 93, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-0815; S.L. 1959, ch. 96, § 1; 1965, ch. 74, § 2; 1983, ch. 606, § 8; 1987, ch. 80, § 1; 1997, ch. 58, § 14; 2015, ch. 439, § 6, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-08-15.1.
Extension work — Additional tax levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 52, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 9; 1987, ch. 80, § 2; 1997, ch. 58, § 15; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.